Indiana, session 2026, SB7.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-39-2-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.163-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, this chapter does not apply to extractable mineral resources.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter does
not preclude the exercise of rights provided by IC 14-37-9.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter applies
to the underground storage of carbon dioxide.
(d) The rights and requirements of this chapter:
(1) are subordinate to the rights pertaining to oil, gas, and coal
resources; and
(2) may not adversely affect oil, gas, and coal resources, except
as is strictly necessary to construct and maintain a carbon
sequestration project that will provide for the permanent storage
of carbon dioxide.
(e) The amendments made to this chapter by SEA 7-2026 do not
apply to a carbon sequestration project, including the
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


transportation of carbon dioxide associated with the project, that
has been authorized to proceed under a UIC Class VI permit issued
prior to July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. IC 14-39-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.25-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this chapter.
(b) "Carbon dioxide" has the meaning set forth in IC 14-39-1-1.
(c) "Carbon dioxide injection well" refers to a well that is used to
inject carbon dioxide into a reservoir for carbon sequestration pursuant
to a UIC Class VI permit.
(d) "Carbon dioxide plume" means the extent of an underground
three-dimensional injected carbon dioxide stream.
(e) "Carbon sequestration" means the underground storage of carbon
dioxide in a reservoir.
(f) "Carbon sequestration project" means any project that involves
the underground storage of carbon dioxide in a reservoir pursuant to at
least one (1) UIC Class VI permit.
(g) "Legislative body" means the following:
(1) The board of county commissioners, for a county not
subject to IC 36-2-3.5 or IC 36-3-1.
(2) The county council, for a county subject to IC 36-2-3.5.
(3) The city-county council, for a consolidated city or county
having a consolidated city.
(g) (h) "Mineral lessee" means a lessee identified by the records of
the recorder of deeds for each county containing a portion of the
proposed reservoir who holds an interest in minerals on real property
that are located above, below, or within the proposed reservoir that has
been severed from the surface estate by:
(1) grant;
(2) exception;
(3) reservation;
(4) lease; or
(5) any other means.
(h) (i) "Mineral owner" means an owner identified by the records of
the recorder of deeds for each county containing a portion of the
proposed reservoir who holds an interest in minerals on real property
that are located above, below, or within the proposed reservoir that has
been severed from the surface estate by:
(1) grant;
(2) exception;
(3) reservation;
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


(4) lease; or
(5) any other means.
(i) (j) "Pore space" means subsurface cavities or voids that can be
used as a storage space for carbon dioxide.
(j) (k) "Pore space owner" means:
(1) a person;
(2) a trust;
(3) a corporation; or
(4) another entity;
that has title to, a right to, or an interest in pore space.
(k) (l) "Reservoir" means a subsurface:
(1) sedimentary stratum;
(2) formation;
(3) aquifer;
(4) cavity; or
(5) void;
that is naturally or artificially created for the use of, or is capable of
being made suitable for, injecting and storing carbon dioxide.
(l) (m) "Storage facility" means the subsurface area consisting of the
extent of a carbon dioxide plume which is required to be delineated on
an approved UIC Class VI permit or an amendment to a UIC Class VI
permit of a storage operator.
(m) (n) "Storage operator" means:
(1) a person;
(2) a trust;
(3) a corporation; or
(4) another entity;
that operates a carbon sequestration project.
(n) (o) "Surface or subsurface property interest owner" means a
property interest owner identified by the records of the recorder of
deeds for each county containing a portion of the proposed storage
facility who holds a fee simple interest or other freehold interest in the
surface or subsurface of the property, which may include mineral
rights. The term does not include the owner of a right-of-way, an
easement, or a leasehold.
(o) (p) "UIC Class VI permit" means a permit issued under the
federal Safe Drinking Water Act's Underground Injection Control
program that allows:
(1) a person;
(2) a trust;
(3) a corporation; or
(4) another entity;
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


to construct or operate a carbon dioxide injection well.
(p) (q) "Underground storage of carbon dioxide" means the injection
and storage of carbon dioxide into underground strata and formations
pursuant to at least one (1) UIC Class VI permit.
SECTION 3. IC 14-39-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 136, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Carbon sequestration projects
are authorized in Indiana for the purposes of:
(1) injecting carbon dioxide into the pore space of an underground
storage facility through at least one (1) carbon dioxide injection
well pursuant to a UIC Class VI permit; and
(2) employing the underground storage of carbon dioxide.
(b) A storage operator may not operate a carbon sequestration
project in Indiana without:
(1) a UIC Class VI permit; and
(2) a valid permit issued by the department; and
(3) if applicable, the proper approval described in section 5.5
of this chapter.
(c) If a carbon sequestration project is owned by an entity other than
the storage operator, the storage operator shall be responsible for
obtaining a permit for a carbon sequestration project under subsection
(b). A permit for a carbon sequestration project may be transferred or
assigned from one (1) storage operator to another storage operator.
(d) An individual may apply to the department for a permit for a
carbon sequestration project in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.
(e) An application under subsection (d) must include the following:
(1) A filing fee equal to the product of:
(A) the given amount of metric tons of carbon dioxide
proposed to be injected into the storage facility during the first
ten (10) years of the permit for the carbon sequestration
project; multiplied by
(B) one cent ($0.01).
The filing fee amount determined under this subdivision shall be
collected by the department and deposited in the carbon
sequestration project program administrative fund established by
section 10.5 of this chapter.
(2) The signature of the applicant.
(3) A statement verifying that the information submitted is true,
accurate, and complete to the best of applicant's knowledge.
(4) Information illustrating that the applicant has the financial,
managerial, and technical ability to construct, operate, and
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


maintain a carbon sequestration project.
(5) Information illustrating that the applicant or the contractors or
subcontractors of the applicant have the requisite expertise in
constructing, operating, and maintaining a carbon sequestration
project.
(6) Documentation to the department describing the scope of the
proposed carbon sequestration project.
(7) A statement describing how the applicant will construct,
operate, and maintain the proposed carbon sequestration project
in accordance with applicable local, state, and federal law,
including federal and state safety regulations and rules governing
the construction, operation, and maintenance of the carbon
sequestration project, and related facilities and equipment, to
ensure the safety of the carbon sequestration project employees
and the public.
(8) A statement that the interests of a mineral lessee or mineral
owner will not be adversely affected. If a mineral owner or
mineral lessee is adversely affected, the adversely affected
mineral owner or mineral lessee and the applicant may enter into
an agreement under section 4 of this chapter.
(9) A certified copy of:
(A) the approval of the plan commission under section
5.5(1) of this chapter; or
(B) the ordinance adopted by the legislative body under
section 5.5(2) of this chapter.
(f) During the first ten (10) years of the permit for a carbon
sequestration project, if the carbon sequestration project injects more
metric tons of carbon dioxide into the storage facility than was
proposed under the original application under subsection (e), the
storage operator shall pay the filing fee under subsection (e) for the
additional metric tons of carbon dioxide injected into the storage
facility during the first ten (10) years of the permit for the carbon
sequestration project.
(g) A fee paid under this section is not refundable by the
department.
SECTION 4. IC 14-39-2-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. A storage operator may not operate a carbon
sequestration project that transports or stores carbon dioxide
outside the county where the carbon dioxide is generated unless the
project is approved in a public meeting as follows:
(1) If the carbon sequestration project is located in an area
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


that is subject to the jurisdiction of an area plan commission
under IC 36-7-4, the carbon sequestration project must be
approved by the area plan commission. An area plan
commission may not delegate the authority of the area plan
commission to approve a carbon sequestration project to an
administrator, hearing officer, committee, or staff.
(2) If the carbon sequestration project is located in an area
that is not subject to the jurisdiction of an area plan
commission under IC 36-7-4, the carbon sequestration project
must be approved by an ordinance adopted by the legislative
body.
SECTION 5. IC 36-7-4-1016, AS AMENDED BY P.L.130-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1016. (a) Final decisions of the board of zoning
appeals under:
(1) the 900 series of this chapter (administrative appeals,
exceptions, uses, and variances); or
(2) section 1015 of this chapter (appeals of commitment
modifications or terminations);
are considered zoning decisions for purposes of this chapter and are
subject to judicial review in accordance with the 1600 series of this
chapter.
(b) The following decisions of the plan commission are considered
zoning decisions for purposes of this chapter and are subject to judicial
review in the same manner as that provided for the appeal of a final
decision of the board of zoning appeals under subsection (a):
(1) A final decision under the 700 series of this chapter
(subdivision control).
(2) A final decision under section 1015 of this chapter (appeal of
a commitment modification or termination).
(3) A final decision under the 1400 series of this chapter
(development plans).
(4) A final decision under the 1500 series of this chapter (planned
unit development), when authority to make a final decision is
delegated to the plan commission by the legislative body under
section 1511 of this chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b)(2), decisions of a legislative
body under section 1015(b)(6) or 1015(b)(10) of this chapter are not
considered zoning decisions for purposes of this chapter and are not
subject to judicial review in accordance with the 1600 series of this
chapter.
(d) Final decisions of preservation commissions under IC 36-7-11,
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


IC 36-7-11.1, IC 36-7-11.2, or IC 36-7-11.3 (certificates of
appropriateness) are considered zoning decisions for purposes of this
chapter and are subject to judicial review in the same manner as that
provided for the appeal of a final decision of the board of zoning
appeals under subsection (a).
(e) Final decisions of zoning administrators under IC 14-28-4-18
(improvement location permits within flood plain areas) are considered
zoning decisions for purposes of this chapter and are subject to judicial
review in the same manner as that provided for the appeal of a final
decision of the board of zoning appeals under subsection (a).
(f) Final decisions of an area plan commission under
IC 14-39-2-5.5(1) concerning carbon sequestration projects are
considered zoning decisions for purposes of this chapter and are
subject to judicial review in the same manner as that provided for
the appeal of a final decision of the board of zoning appeals under
subsection (a).
(f) (g) The following actions are legislative acts and are not
considered zoning decisions for purposes of this chapter:
(1) Adopting or approving a comprehensive plan under the 500
series of this chapter.
(2) Certifying with or without a recommendation a proposal under
the 600 series of this chapter.
(3) Adopting, rejecting, or amending a zoning ordinance under
the 600 series of this chapter.
(4) Adopting, rejecting, or amending an impact fee ordinance
under the 1300 series of this chapter.
(5) Designating a zoning district where a development plan is
required under the 1400 series of this chapter.
(6) Adopting, rejecting, or amending a PUD district ordinance
under the 1500 series of this chapter.
(7) Adopting, rejecting, or amending a flood plain zoning
ordinance under IC 14-28-4.
(8) Certifying a recommendation, or modifying or terminating a
commitment, under section 1015(b)(6) or 1015(b)(10) of this
chapter.
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


REPORT OF THE PRESIDENT
PRO TEMPORE
Mr. President: Pursuant to Senate Rule 68(b), I hereby report that
Senate Bill 7, currently assigned to the Committee on Utilities, be
reassigned to the Committee on Environmental Affairs.
BRAY
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Environmental Affairs, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 7, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to SB 07 as introduced.)
NIEMEYER, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 3
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 7 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 14-39-2-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.163-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, this chapter does not apply to extractable mineral resources.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter does
not preclude the exercise of rights provided by IC 14-37-9.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter applies
to the underground storage of carbon dioxide.
(d) The rights and requirements of this chapter:
(1) are subordinate to the rights pertaining to oil, gas, and coal
resources; and
(2) may not adversely affect oil, gas, and coal resources, except
as is strictly necessary to construct and maintain a carbon
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153


sequestration project that will provide for the permanent storage
of carbon dioxide.
(e) The amendments made to this chapter by SEA 7-2026 do not
apply to a carbon sequestration project, including the
transportation of carbon dioxide associated with the project, that
has been authorized to proceed under a UIC Class VI permit issued
prior to July 1, 2026.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to SB 7 as printed January 27, 2026.)
BALDWIN
SB 7—LS 6088/DI 153